fixer/src/main/resources/la/la/universal/la.aff
SFX D Y 504
SFX D sum     sum             sum       
SFX D sum     sumque          sum       
SFX D sum     sumne           sum       
SFX D sum     sumve           sum       
SFX D sum     sumue           sum         
SFX D sum     es              sum       
SFX D sum     esque           sum       
SFX D sum     esne            sum       
SFX D sum     esve            sum       
SFX D sum     esue            sum         
SFX D sum     est             sum       
SFX D sum     estque          sum       
SFX D sum     estne           sum       
SFX D sum     estve           sum       
SFX D sum     estue           sum         
SFX D sum     sumus           sum       
SFX D sum     sumusque        sum       
SFX D sum     sumusne         sum       
SFX D sum     sumusve         sum       
SFX D sum     sumusue         sum         
SFX D sum     estis           sum       
SFX D sum     estisque        sum       
SFX D sum     estisne         sum       
SFX D sum     estisve         sum       
SFX D sum     estisue         sum         
SFX D sum     sunt            sum       
SFX D sum     suntque         sum       
SFX D sum     suntne          sum       
SFX D sum     suntve          sum       
SFX D sum     suntue          sum         
SFX D sum     eram            sum       
SFX D sum     eramque         sum       
SFX D sum     eramne          sum       
SFX D sum     eramve          sum       
SFX D sum     eramue          sum         
SFX D sum     eras            sum       
SFX D sum     erasque         sum       
SFX D sum     erasne          sum       
SFX D sum     erasve          sum       
SFX D sum     erasue          sum         
SFX D sum     erat            sum       
SFX D sum     eratque         sum       
SFX D sum     eratne          sum       
SFX D sum     eratve          sum       
SFX D sum     eratue          sum         
SFX D sum     eramus          sum       
SFX D sum     eramusque       sum       
SFX D sum     eramusne        sum       
SFX D sum     eramusve        sum       
SFX D sum     eramusue        sum         
SFX D sum     eratis          sum       
SFX D sum     eratisque       sum       
SFX D sum     eratisne        sum       
SFX D sum     eratisve        sum       
SFX D sum     eratisue        sum         
SFX D sum     erant           sum       
SFX D sum     erantque        sum       
SFX D sum     erantne         sum       
SFX D sum     erantve         sum       
SFX D sum     erantue         sum         
SFX D sum     ero             sum       
SFX D sum     eroque          sum       
SFX D sum     erone           sum       
SFX D sum     erove           sum       
SFX D sum     eroue           sum         
SFX D sum     eris            sum       
SFX D sum     erisque         sum       
SFX D sum     erisne          sum       
SFX D sum     erisve          sum       
SFX D sum     erisue          sum         
SFX D sum     erit            sum       
SFX D sum     eritque         sum       
SFX D sum     eritne          sum       
SFX D sum     eritve          sum       
SFX D sum     eritue          sum         
SFX D sum     erimus          sum       
SFX D sum     erimusque       sum       
SFX D sum     erimusne        sum       
SFX D sum     erimusve        sum       
SFX D sum     erimusue        sum         
SFX D sum     eritis          sum       
SFX D sum     eritisque       sum       
SFX D sum     eritisne        sum       
SFX D sum     eritisve        sum       
SFX D sum     eritisue        sum         
SFX D sum     erunt           sum       
SFX D sum     eruntque        sum       
SFX D sum     eruntne         sum       
SFX D sum     eruntve         sum       
SFX D sum     eruntue         sum         
SFX D sum     sim             sum       
SFX D sum     simque          sum       
SFX D sum     simne           sum       
SFX D sum     simve           sum       
SFX D sum     simue           sum         
SFX D sum     sis             sum       
SFX D sum     sisque          sum       
SFX D sum     sisne           sum       
SFX D sum     sisve           sum       
SFX D sum     sisue           sum         
SFX D sum     sit             sum       
SFX D sum     sitque          sum       
SFX D sum     sitne           sum       
SFX D sum     sitve           sum       
SFX D sum     situe           sum         
SFX D sum     simus           sum       
SFX D sum     simusque        sum       
SFX D sum     simusne         sum       
SFX D sum     simusve         sum       
SFX D sum     simusue         sum         
SFX D sum     sitis           sum       
SFX D sum     sitisque        sum       
SFX D sum     sitisne         sum       
SFX D sum     sitisve         sum       
SFX D sum     sitisue         sum         
SFX D sum     sint            sum       
SFX D sum     sintque         sum       
SFX D sum     sintne          sum       
SFX D sum     sintve          sum       
SFX D sum     sintue          sum         
SFX D sum     essem           sum       
SFX D sum     essemque        sum       
SFX D sum     essemne         sum       
SFX D sum     essemve         sum       
SFX D sum     essemue         sum         
SFX D sum     esses           sum       
SFX D sum     essesque        sum       
SFX D sum     essesne         sum       
SFX D sum     essesve         sum       
SFX D sum     essesue         sum         
SFX D sum     esset           sum       
SFX D sum     essetque        sum       
SFX D sum     essetne         sum       
SFX D sum     essetve         sum       
SFX D sum     essetue         sum         
SFX D sum     essemus         sum       
SFX D sum     essemusque      sum       
SFX D sum     essemusne       sum       
SFX D sum     essemusve       sum       
SFX D sum     essemusue       sum         
SFX D sum     essetis         sum       
SFX D sum     essetisque      sum       
SFX D sum     essetisne       sum       
SFX D sum     essetisve       sum       
SFX D sum     essetisue       sum         
SFX D sum     essent          sum       
SFX D sum     essentque       sum       
SFX D sum     essentne        sum       
SFX D sum     essentve        sum       
SFX D sum     essentue        sum         
SFX D sum     es              sum       
SFX D sum     esque           sum       
SFX D sum     esne            sum       
SFX D sum     esve            sum       
SFX D sum     esue            sum         
SFX D sum     este            sum       
SFX D sum     esteque         sum       
SFX D sum     estene          sum       
SFX D sum     esteve          sum       
SFX D sum     esteue          sum         
SFX D sum     esto            sum       
SFX D sum     estoque         sum       
SFX D sum     estone          sum       
SFX D sum     estove          sum       
SFX D sum     estoue          sum         
SFX D sum     estote          sum       
SFX D sum     estoteque       sum       
SFX D sum     estotene        sum       
SFX D sum     estoteve        sum       
SFX D sum     estoteue        sum         
SFX D sum     sunto           sum       
SFX D sum     suntoque        sum       
SFX D sum     suntone         sum       
SFX D sum     suntove         sum       
SFX D sum     suntoue         sum         
SFX D sum     esse            sum       
SFX D sum     esseque         sum       
SFX D sum     essene          sum       
SFX D sum     esseve          sum       
SFX D sum     esseue          sum         
SFX D sum     fore            sum       
SFX D sum     foreque         sum       
SFX D sum     forene          sum       
SFX D sum     foreve          sum       
SFX D sum     foreue          sum         
SFX D sum     forem           sum       
SFX D sum     foremque        sum       
SFX D sum     foremne         sum       
SFX D sum     foremve         sum       
SFX D sum     foremue         sum         
SFX D sum     fores           sum       
SFX D sum     foresque        sum       
